Hawaii statutes.
[§414-192] Qualifications of directors.
The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for
directors. A director need not be a resident of this State or a shareholder of
the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws so prescribe. [L
2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next